Utah statutes.
41-4-7.   Violation by corporation -- Penalty.
For a violation of any of the provisions of this act by any corporation or
association mentioned herein, it shall be the duty of the attorney general or
the district attorney of the proper county, to institute proper suits or quo
warranto proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction for the forfeiture
of its charter rights, franchises or privileges and powers exercised by such
corporation or association, and for the dissolution of the same under the
general statutes of the state.
